Vermont statutes. Title 5 Aeronautics and Surface Transportation Generally
Subchapter 3. State Aid to Municipalities Generally

§ 691.
Grants by State.

For the purpose of developing adequate air facilities for this State through assistance to municipalities in the acquirement, construction, expansion, enlargement, or improvement of an airport in this State, the Secretary is authorized to grant from available appropriations to a municipality a sum not exceeding three-fifths of the sum of the local matching funds required to support funds granted by the federal government. However, for the construction, expansion, enlargement, or improvement of airports sponsored by the State of Vermont in conjunction with the federal government, the amount of State funds may match as necessary the sum granted by the federal government.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 222

(Adj. Sess.), § 2.

§ 692.
Proportion to federal funds.

In the event that funds appropriated for the purposes of this subchapter are insufficient to meet the proportion of matching funds specified in this section for the federal grant to a municipality for that project, the Secretary is authorized to execute grants to municipalities in the proportion that the total funds provided, for that fiscal year, will bear to the total of federal airport funds allocated to municipalities within the State for that fiscal year.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 222

(Adj. Sess.), § 2.

§ 693.
Conditions.

A municipality receiving grants from the State of Vermont shall meet such conditions as the Secretary:

may establish with respect to maintenance and continued use of the subject airport site for aeronautical purposes; and

shall establish in order to require the municipality to assist the State in identifying vendors that distribute, sell, or use aircraft jet fuel in the State in connection with the airport.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 222

(Adj. Sess.), § 2; amended

2017, No. 158

(Adj. Sess.), § 39.

§ 694.
Application.

Subject to the provisions of section 695 of this title, a municipality may apply to the Secretary for funds provided for the purposes of this subchapter when the municipality has received a tentative allocation of federal airport funds for a project.
Upon approval of the application by the Secretary, the funds provided under terms of this subchapter will be allocated to the municipality and held for a reasonable time.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 222

(Adj. Sess.), § 2.

§ 695.
Federal assistance.

A municipality may petition the Secretary to serve as its agent to accept, receive, account for, and disburse all funds granted by the United States for an airport project. If the Secretary agrees to serve as agent, the municipality shall enter into an agreement with the Secretary prescribing the terms and conditions of the agency relationship in accordance with any applicable federal or State laws or regulations.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 222

(Adj. Sess.), § 2; amended

2011, No. 62

, § 18.

§ 696.
Payment.

Following inspection and audit of costs allowable under terms of the Federal Airport Act and amendments to that act, funds shall be payable upon application by the municipality at the times designated by the Secretary, but in no case shall the total amount of State funds granted to a municipality under provisions of this section exceed the amount approved by the Secretary under section 694 of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 222

(Adj. Sess.), § 2.

§ 697.
Responsibility, title, and maintenance on completion of project.

Upon completion of the project, title to, responsibility for, and maintenance of the airport shall rest with the municipality.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 222

(Adj. Sess.), § 2.